Florida, session 2026, SB1522.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 282.3187, Florida Statutes, is created 15 to read: 16 282.3187âSecurity of state technology systems.â 17 (1)âAs the state continues to implement its cloud-first 18 policy and transition agency applications and datasets into 19 modern cloud environments, each state agency shall deploy cloud 20 native cybersecurity platforms designed to safeguard cloud and 21 hybrid infrastructure. 22 (2)âState agencies shall use platforms that: 23 (a)âProvide unified visibility across multi-cloud and 24 hybrid environments; 25 (b)âEnable continuous posture management, misconfiguration 26 detection, and automated risk prioritization to reduce cloud 27 attack surface; 28 (c)âSupport secure cloud application development, including 29 code-to-runtime protection; 30 (d)âDeliver real-time threat detection and response within 31 cloud workloads and identities; and 32 (e)âProvide automated compliance monitoring across state 33 and federal cybersecurity frameworks. 34 (3)âBy October 1, 2026, the state chief information officer 35 shall brief the appropriate committees of the Legislature on all 36 of the following: 37 (a)âThe stateâs progress in continuously monitoring the 38 security of all cloud, on-premises, and hybrid application 39 environments. 40 (b)âThe identification of systemic risks and 41 misconfigurations across agency cloud deployments. 42 (c)âThe development of a future artificial intelligence 43 security roadmap, including recommendations for securing 44 artificial intelligence systems, models, and automated 45 decisionmaking tools used by state agencies. 46 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.